District of Columbia statutes.
31-909

Effective date of the plan.

A plan shall become effective when the Commissioner has approved the plan.

May 24, 1996, D.C. Law 11-126, § 10, 43 DCR 1551
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 43(h), 45 DCR 745
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-214, § 2(e), 47 DCR 9580
1981 Ed., § 35-4209.
D.C. Law 13-214 rewrote the section which had read:
“A plan shall become effective when the Commissioner has approved the plan, the members have approved the plan, and the revised articles of incorporation have been filed.”